Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4607
Filing of claim.

A claim brought pursuant
to the Nebraska Claims for Wrongful Conviction and Imprisonment Act shall
be filed under the State Tort Claims Act.

Laws 2009, LB260, § 7.

State Tort Claims Act, see section 81-8,235.